Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.56, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Limitations on consumption; locations of consumption. (a) Nothing in sections 342.51 to 342.60 permits any person to engage in, and does not prevent the imposition of any civil, criminal, or other penalties for: (1) undertaking a task under the influence of medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid products that would constitute negligence or professional malpractice; (2) possessing or consuming medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid products: (i) on a school bus or van; (ii) in a correctional facility; (iii) in a state-operated treatment program, including the Minnesota sex offender program; or (iv) on the grounds of a child care facility or family or group family day care program; (3) vaporizing or smoking medical cannabis: (i) on any form of public transportation; (ii) where the vapor would be inhaled by a nonpatient minor or where the smoke would be inhaled by a minor; or (iii) in any public place, including any indoor or outdoor area used by or open to the general public or a place of employment, as defined in section 144.413, subdivision 1b; and (4) operating, navigating, or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle, aircraft, train, or motorboat or working on transportation property, equipment, or facilities while under the influence of medical cannabis flower or a medical cannabinoid product. (b) deleted text begin Except for the use of medical cannabis flower or medical cannabinoid products,deleted text end The vaporizing or smoking of cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, or hemp-derived consumer products is prohibited in a multifamily housing building, including balconies and patios appurtenant thereto. A violation of this paragraph is punishable through a civil administrative fine in an amount of $250.